Missouri, session 2026, HB2695.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 558.041, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 558.041, to read as follows:
558.041. 1. Any offender committed to the department of corrections, except those
persons committed pursuant to subsection 7 of section 558.016, or subsection 3 of section
566.125, [may] shall receive additional credit in terms of days spent in confinement upon
[recommendation for such credit by the offender's institutional superintendent] calculation of
such credit when the offender meets the requirements for such credit as provided in
[subsections 3 and 4 of] this section. Good time credit or earned time credit may be
rescinded by the director or his or her designee pursuant to the divisional policy issued
pursuant to subdivision (2) of subsection [3] 2 of this section.
2. (1) Any credit extended to an offender shall only apply to the sentence which the
offender is currently serving.
[3.] (2) The director of the department of corrections shall issue a policy for
awarding good time credit and, separately, earned time credit.
(3) The policy [may] shall reward an [inmate] offender who has served his or her
sentence in an orderly and peaceable manner [and has] through good time credit as
provided in subsection 3 of this section and award an offender who has successfully
taken advantage of the rehabilitation programs and productive activities available to him or
her through earned time credit as provided in subsection 4 of this section.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2695 2
(4) Any major conduct violation of institutional rules [or], violation of the laws of
this state [may], parole revocation, or the accumulation of minor conduct violations
exceeding six within a calendar year shallresult in the loss of all [or a portion of any] prior
credit earned by the [inmate] offender pursuant to this section.
[4. The department shall cause the policy to be published in the code of state
regulations.
5. No rule or portion of a rule promulgated under the authority of this chapter shall
become effective unless it has been promulgated pursuant to the provisions of section
536.024.]
3. (1) Subject to subsections 1 and 2 of this section, an offender who is serving a
term of imprisonment of more than one year, other than a term of imprisonment for the
duration of the offender's life, may receive good time credit toward the service of the
offender's sentence of up to fifty-four days for each year of the offender's sentence
imposed by the court, subject to yearly determination by the department of corrections
that during that year the offender has displayed exemplary compliance with
institutional disciplinary regulations.
(2) If the department of corrections determines that during the year the offender
has not satisfactorily complied with such institutional regulations, the offender shall
receive no good time credit toward service of sentence or shall receive such lesser credit
as the department determines to be appropriate. Credit that has not been earned shall
not later be granted. Credit for the last year of a term of imprisonment shall be credited
on the first day of the last year of the term of imprisonment.
4. (1) Subject to subsections 1 and 2 of this section, an offender who is serving a
term of imprisonment of more than one year, other than a term of imprisonment for the
duration of the offender's life, and who successfully participates in rehabilitative
programming or productive activities shall earn ten days of earned time credit for every
thirty days of successful participation in rehabilitative programming or productive
activities.
(2) An offender shall not receive earned time credits under this subsection for
programs completed prior to the date that the offender's sentence commenced.
(3) The department of corrections shall specify in its policies under subsection 2
of this section the types of programs or activities for which credit may be earned under
this section; the criteria for determining productive participation in, or completion of,
the programs or activities; and the criteria for annually awarding credit. Such
programs and activities shall include, but are not limited to, receiving a high school
diploma or equivalent, college diploma or professional certificate, or vocational training
certificates, and participating in successful employment, parenting, and financial

HB 2695 3
literacy courses, alcohol and drug abuse treatment programs, and restorative justice
and faith-based programs. The department of corrections shall include provisions for
educational programming through correspondence courses.
(4) Beginning on January 1, 2027, eligible offenders may petition the department
to receive earned time credit for any qualifying programs or activities completed after
January 1, 2010.
(5) The department of corrections shall notify the incarcerated population of the
petition process through posted signage, electronic notification, and through staff in all
facilities and shall provide a petition form to offenders.
5. (1) Offenders sentenced under subsections 2 and 3 of section 558.019 shall be
eligible for good time credit and earned time credit and any credit earned shall be
subtracted from the offender's entire sentence of imprisonment.
(2) Offenders committed to the department who are sentenced to death or
sentenced to life without probation or parole shall not be eligible for good time credit or
earned time credit under this section; however, the department shall record their
program participation in the same manner as the eligible population.
(3) The incentives described in this section shall be in addition to any other
rewards or credits for which an offender may be eligible.
(4) Nothing in this section shall be construed to remove the parole board's
discretion in awarding good time credit or earned time credit.
✔